New York, session 2025-2026, S2308.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 14 of the transportation law is amended by adding a 2 new subdivision 37 to read as follows: 3 37. To install signs on all state highways maintained by the depart- 4 ment in an effort to raise motorcycle awareness. Such signs shall clear- 5 ly state "Watch for Motorcycles". The design, place and manner of 6 installation of such signs shall conform to the manual on uniform traf- 7 fic control devices adopted by the commissioner. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of April next succeeding 9 the date upon which it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, 10 the addition, amendment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation neces- 11 sary for the implementation of this act on its effective date are 12 authorized to be made and completed on or before such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00217-01-5